Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2279.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-7 of the General Laws entitled "Arrest" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
12-7-1.1. Temporary detention by private college or university public safety
personnel.
(a) A private institution of higher education chartered by the state and maintaining a
campus within the state may authorize trained public safety officers or security personnel employed
by the institution to temporarily detain an individual upon campus property when:
(1) The officer has probable cause to believe that:
(i) The individual has committed a felony; or
(ii) The individual has committed a misdemeanor involving violence, theft, trespass,
property destruction, disorderly conduct, or other breach of the peace occurring in the officer's
presence; and
(2) The detention is reasonably necessary to:
(i) Prevent imminent harm to persons or property;
(ii) Prevent the individual's escape prior to the arrival of law enforcement; or
(iii) Maintain public safety.
(b) A detention authorized under this section:
(1) Shall be conducted using the least restrictive means reasonably available;
(2) Shall occur only upon property owned, leased, operated, or controlled by the institution;

(3) Shall not constitute an arrest; and
(4) Shall not confer any general law enforcement authority upon the person conducting the
detention.
(c) Immediately upon detaining an individual pursuant to this section, the public safety
officer or security officer shall request assistance from the state police or local law enforcement
agency having jurisdiction.
(d) A person detained pursuant to this section shall be informed as soon as practicable:
(1) That the detention is temporary;
(2) Of the reason for the detention; and
(3) That law enforcement has been summoned.
(e) Physical restraint may be used only when reasonably necessary to:
(1) Protect the officer or another person from physical injury;
(2) Prevent the destruction of evidence;
(3) Prevent escape; or
(4) Prevent imminent damage to property.
The degree of force used shall not exceed that which is objectively reasonable under the
circumstances.
(f) Handcuffs or other restraint devices may be used only by personnel who have
successfully completed training approved by the Rhode Island police officer standards and training
academy or another training program approved by the department of public safety.
(g) Every institution exercising authority under this section shall:
(1) Maintain written policies governing detention procedures, use of force, reporting
requirements, and training standards;
(2) Require annual training for all personnel authorized to conduct detentions;
(3) Maintain records of all detentions for not less than five (5) years; and
(4) Make such records available to law enforcement upon request.
(h) Within twenty-four (24) hours of any detention conducted pursuant to this section, the
institution shall prepare a written incident report documenting:
(1) The reason for the detention;
(2) The duration of the detention;
(3) Any force or restraints utilized;
(4) The law enforcement agency notified; and
(5) The disposition of the incident.
(i) A public safety officer, security officer, or institution acting in good faith and in
LC004329/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 4

reasonable reliance upon this section shall not be liable for civil damages arising from a detention
authorized by this section, except for conduct constituting gross negligence, reckless conduct, or
willful misconduct.
(j) Nothing contained herein shall:
(1) Authorize a search beyond that otherwise permitted by law;
(2) Grant arrest powers to non-sworn personnel;
(3) Confer peace officer status upon any individual; or
(4) Limit any authority otherwise granted to special police officers appointed pursuant to
chapter 2.1 of title 12.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004329/SUB A/2
========
LC004329/SUB A/2 - Page 3 of 4